Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB686.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 210 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Commission" means the Kentucky Positive Youth Development Commission
established in Section 2 of this Act;
(2) "Department" means the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities;
(3) "Eligible organization" means an organization that provides positive youth
development programming;
(4) "Positive youth development programming":
(a) Means structured programs or activities that:
1. Promote youth mental well-being;
2. Aim to reduce risk factors for suicide, self-harm, and related adverse
outcomes of mental health challenges;
3. Engage youth through adult mentorship, enrichment, after school
supports, and community connection;
4. Utilize evidence-based or evidence-informed practices;
5. Are prevention-focused;
6. Are provided to youth outside of school hours; and
7. Are provided to parents and adult caregivers for the purpose of family
engagement; and
(b) Does not include education programming provided during school hours;
and
(5) "Youth" means school-age children and young adults up to age twenty-five (25).
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 210 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Positive Youth Development Commission is hereby established and shall be
attached to the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities within the cabinet to promote youth well-being and
Page 2 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
connection to prevent self-harm among children and youth through accessible,
community-based programs. The cabinet shall provide staffing for the
commission.
(2) (a) The commission shall consist of the following voting members:
1. The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities or his or her designee,
who shall act as chair;
2. The State Treasurer or his or her designee;
3. The secretary of the cabinet or his or her designee;
4. The commissioner of the Department for Public Health or his or her
designee;
5. The commissioner of the Department of Education or his or her
designee;
6. The Attorney General or his or her designee;
7. The chairperson of the State Interagency Council for Services and
Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth or his or her
designee;
8. One (1) member appointed by the chairperson of the State Interagency
Council for Services and Supports to Children and Transition-Age
Youth to represent the regional interagency councils;
9. One (1) member appointed by the secretary representing the Suicide
Prevention Program within the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities;
10. Two (2) members appointed by the secretary representing
grantmaking organizations that have funded grants to serve children
and youth;
11. One (1) member appointed by the Attorney General representing law
Page 3 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
enforcement;
12. One (1) member appointed by the secretary who is a mental health
provider specializing in the mental, social, and emotional development
of children;
13. One (1) member appointed by the secretary representing the Kentucky
Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics;
14. One (1) member appointed by the secretary who is a psychologist
specializing in social media addiction; and
15. One (1) member appointed by the Department of Kentucky State
Police who is a Kentucky State Police school resource officer as
defined in KRS 158.441.
(b) The commission shall consist of the following nonvoting members who
shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authorities:
1. One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
2. One (1) member appointed by the President of the Senate;
3. One (1) member appointed by Kentucky Youth Advocates;
4. Two (2) members appointed by the secretary from statewide youth-
serving organizations from geographically diverse areas; and
5. One (1) member from the Kentucky Out-of-School Alliance.
(3) (a) Members of the commission appointed under subsection (2)(a)1. to 7. of this
section shall serve terms concurrent with holding their respective offices or
positions.
(b) The remaining members of the commission shall serve staggered two (2)
year terms.
(c) Members of the commission shall not receive compensation for their
services but may be reimbursed for necessary travel and lodging expenses
Page 4 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
incurred in the performance of their duties.
(4) (a) Meetings of the commission shall be conducted according to KRS 61.805 to
61.850.
(b) The commission shall meet at least twice within each calendar year.
(c) Eight (8) voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business.
(d) Each voting member of the commission shall have one (1) vote, with all
actions being taken by an affirmative vote of the majority of members
present.
(5) The commission may contract with any public or private agency or any individual
for research, the gathering of information, the printing and publication of
reports, consulting, or for any other purposes necessary to discharge the duties of
the commission.
(6) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Establish a grant application process for eligible organizations;
(b) Award moneys from the positive youth development fund established in
Section 3 of this Act to eligible organizations to fund positive youth
development programming impacting children and youth in Kentucky; and
(c) Identify and coordinate with a grantmaking entity to develop applications
and reporting requirements, monitor utilization of granted funds,
administer quality control, and evaluate services or grant funds to fulfill
these duties.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 210 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the positive youth development fund. The fund shall consist of:
Page 5 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
(a) Moneys received by the Commonwealth, counties, consolidated local
governments, urban-county governments, and cities of the Commonwealth
in any settlement, judgement, or bankruptcy proceeding against any social
media company or person related to harms against children and youth to
the extent that it is not inconsistent with an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction; and
(b) Any other moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal
funds, and any other source not prohibited by law.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the cabinet.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes described in
Sections 1 to 3 of this Act and for no other purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) The commission shall reserve ten percent (10%) of the funds to administer the
grant program and provide technical assistance to organizations applying for and
administering grants under Sections 1 to 3 of this Act.
(6) Moneys in the funds shall be distributed no less than annually.
(7) (a) The Office of the Attorney General may recover its reasonable costs of
litigation from moneys received from a legal settlement, judgement, or
bankruptcy proceedings related to litigation against social media
companies.
(b) The Office of the Attorney General may recover any direct costs, including
employee time, used to perform or administer the duties required by
Sections 1 to 3 of this Act. The Office of the Attorney General shall report
all such recovered costs to the commission no less than annually.
Section 4. KRS 200.503 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 200.501 to 200.509, unless the context otherwise requires:
Page 6 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
(1) "Child with a behavioral health need" means a child or transition-age youth with, or
at risk of developing, an emotional disability, substance use disorder, or mental,
emotional, or behavioral needs;
(2) "Child with an emotional disability" means a child or transition-age youth with a
clinically significant disorder of thought, mood, perception, orientation, memory, or
behavior that is listed in the current edition of the American Psychiatric
Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and seriously
limits a child's capacity to function in the home, school, or community;
(3) "Child with a serious emotional disability" means a child or transition-age youth
with a clinically significant disorder of thought, mood, perception, orientation,
memory, or behavior that is listed in the current edition of the American Psychiatric
Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and that:
(a) Presents substantial limitations that have persisted for at least one (1) year or
are judged by a mental health professional to be at high risk of continuing for
one (1) year without professional intervention in at least two (2) of the
following five (5) areas: "Self-care," defined as the ability to provide, sustain,
and protect his or herself at a level appropriate to his or her age;
"Interpersonal relationships," defined as the ability to build and maintain
satisfactory relationships with peers and adults; "Family life," defined as the
capacity to live in a family or family type environment; "Self-direction,"
defined as the child's ability to control his or her behavior and to make
decisions in a manner appropriate to his or her age; and "Education," defined
as the ability to learn social and intellectual skills from teachers in available
educational settings;
(b) Is a Kentucky resident and is receiving residential treatment for emotional
disability through the interstate compact;
(c) The Department for Community Based Services has removed the child from
Page 7 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
the child's home and has been unable to maintain the child in a stable setting
due to behavioral health needs; or
(d) Is a person under twenty-one (21) years of age meeting the criteria of
paragraph (a) of this subsection and who was receiving services prior to age
eighteen (18) that must be continued for therapeutic benefit;
(4) "Least restrictive alternative mode of treatment" means treatment given in the least
confining setting which will provide a child or transition-age youth with an
emotional disability or serious emotional disability appropriate treatment or care
consistent with accepted professional practice. For purposes of this section, least
restrictive alternative mode of treatment may include an institutional placement;
(5) "Positive youth development programming" has the same meaning as in Section
1 of this Act;
(6) "System of care" means a spectrum of effective, community-based services and
supports for children and transition-age youth with or at risk of developing
behavioral health needs and their families, that is organized into a coordinated
network, builds meaningful partnerships with families and youth, and addresses
their cultural and linguistic needs, in order to help them to function better at home,
in school, in the community, and throughout life; and
(7)[(6)] "Transition-age youth" means individuals between the ages of sixteen (16)
and twenty-five (25).
Section 5. KRS 200.505 is amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to
Children and Transition-Age Youth. The chairperson of the council shall be designated
by the Governor and shall establish procedures for the council's internal procedures.
(1) This council shall be composed of the following:
(a) Members who shall serve by virtue of their positions: the commissioner of the
Department of Education, the commissioner of the Department for Behavioral
Page 8 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, the state suicide
prevention coordinator from the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, the commissioner of the
Department for Community Based Services, the commissioner of the
Department for Public Health, the Attorney General, the commissioner of the
Department for Medicaid Services, the commissioner of the Department of
Juvenile Justice, the director of the Division of Family Resource and Youth
Services Centers, the executive director of the Office for Children with
Special Health Care Needs, the executive officer of the Department of Family
and Juvenile Services of the Administrative Office of the Courts, the chair of
the Subcommittee for Equity and Justice for all Youth of the Juvenile Justice
Advisory Board, the executive director of the Kentucky Housing Corporation,
the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Vocational Rehabilitation,
and the president of the Council on Postsecondary Education, or their
designees;
(b) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) parent of a child or
transition-age youth with a behavioral health need, who is a consumer of
services and supports within the system of care to serve as a member of the
council, and one (1) parent who meets the same criteria to serve as the parent
member's alternate to serve in the absence of the parent member. For each
appointment to be made, the State Interagency Council for Services and
Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall vote on nominations
submitted by members. The nominee receiving the most votes shall be
appointed. Appointees shall serve a term of two (2) years and may be
reappointed to additional two (2) year terms. If the child of the parent member
or alternate parent member ceases to be a consumer of services and supports
within the system of care during the term of appointment, the member shall be
Page 9 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
eligible to serve out the remainder of the term of appointment. The alternate
parent member may attend and participate in all council meetings but shall
vote only in the absence of the parent member. The parent member and
alternate parent member shall receive no compensation in addition to that
which they may already receive as service providers or state employees who
are required to attend as part of their duties, but the parent member and
alternate parent member shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred through
the performance of their duties as council members if it is outside the scope of
their job duties;
(c) The chairperson of the council shall appoint two (2)[one (1)] youth between
the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-five (25), one (1) who has a behavioral
health disorder and who is receiving or has received services to address
mental health, and one (1) who has substance use, or co-occurring mental
health and substance use disorder, to serve as a member of the council, and
one (1) youth who meets the same criteria to serve as the youth member's
alternate in the absence of the youth member. For each appointment to be
made, the State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children
and Transition-Age Youth shall vote on nominations submitted by members.
The nominee receiving the most votes shall be appointed. Appointees shall
serve a term of two (2) years and may be reappointed to additional two (2)
year terms, and the youth member and the youth member's alternate shall be
eligible to serve out the remainder of their term of appointment regardless of
age. The alternate youth member may attend and participate in all council
meetings but shall vote only in the absence of the youth member. The youth
member and alternate youth member shall receive no compensation in
addition to that which they may already receive as service providers or state
employees who are required to attend as part of their duties, but the youth
Page 10 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
member and alternate youth member shall be reimbursed for expenses
incurred through the performance of their duties as council members if it is
outside the scope of their job duties;
(d) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) member of a nonprofit
family organization representing consumers of services and supports within
the system of care whose membership, leadership, and governance include
parents, primary caregivers, or children or transition-age youth with serious
emotional, behavioral, or mental health needs, to serve as a member of the
council. For each appointment to be made, the chair shall publicly post on the
State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth Web site a solicitation for letters of interest from
qualified organizations and submit all qualified responses to a vote of the full
membership. The organization which receives the most votes shall designate a
representative to serve a term of two (2) years, and may be reappointed to
additional two (2) year terms. The family organization member shall receive
no compensation in addition to that which the member may already receive as
an employee who is required to attend as part of his or her duties, but shall be
reimbursed for expenses incurred through the performance of duties as a
council member if it is outside the scope of his or her job duties; and
(e) At the end of a term, a member shall continue to serve until a successor is
appointed.
(2) The State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth shall:
(a) Make recommendations annually to the Governor and the Legislative
Research Commission regarding the system of care for children and
transition-age youth with or at risk of behavioral health needs;
(b) Direct each regional interagency council to:
Page 11 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
1. Operate as the regional locus of accountability for the system of care;[
and]
2. Participate in family accountability, intervention, and response teams
established pursuant to KRS 605.035; and
3. Coordinate with the Kentucky Positive Youth Development
Commission established in Section 2 of this Act to establish Suicide
Awareness and Reduction Network workgroups that shall:
a. Perform community needs assessments;
b. Research opportunities for positive youth development
programming; and
c. Apply for grants to fund and implement positive youth
development programming;
(c) Assess the effectiveness of regional councils in serving as the locus of
accountability for the system of care for children and transition-age youth
with or at risk of behavioral health needs;
(d) Meet at least monthly and maintain records of meetings; and
(e) Develop a comprehensive array of services and supports to meet the needs of
children and transition-age youth with or at risk of developing behavioral
health needs.
(3) Agencies represented on the state council shall adopt interagency agreements as
necessary to advance the system of care.
(4) The State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to
comply with the requirements of KRS 200.501 to 200.509.
Section 6. KRS 200.509 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There are hereby created regional interagency councils for the system of care.
These councils shall be formed in each area development district within the
Page 12 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
Commonwealth of Kentucky, except that those area development districts that
contain a county with a population greater than one hundred thousand (100,000)
may form up to three (3) such councils. The regional interagency councils shall be
chaired by one (1) member, chosen by a majority vote of the members. Each
council shall be composed of the following members:
(a) The children's services director from each regional community mental health
center or their designee;
(b) One (1) court-designated specialist or court-designated worker chosen by the
executive officer of the Department of Family and Juvenile Services of the
Administrative Office of the Courts;
(c) One (1) special education cooperative representative with behavioral health
experience chosen by the directors of cooperatives in the area served by the
regional council;
(d) One (1) parent of a child with a behavioral health need, who is or has been a
consumer of system of care services and supports, and one (1) parent who
meets the same criteria to serve as the parent member's alternate, who may
attend and participate in all council meetings, but shall vote only in the
absence of the parent member. For each appointment to be made, the regional
interagency council for which the appointment is to be made shall submit to
the chair of the State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to
Children and Transition-Age Youth a list of two (2) names of parents who are
qualified for appointment from which list the chair of the State Interagency
Council for Services and Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall
make the appointment. Appointees shall serve a term of two (2) years, and
may be reappointed to additional two (2) year terms. If the child of the parent
member or alternate parent member ceases to be a consumer of system of care
services and supports during the term of appointment, the member shall be
Page 13 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
eligible to serve out the remainder of the term of appointment;
(e) One (1) transition-age youth who has a behavioral health disorder and who is
receiving or has received a service to address mental health, substance use, or
co-occurring mental health and substance use disorder, and one (1) transition-
age youth who meets the same criteria to serve as the youth member's
alternate in the absence of the youth member. For each appointment to be
made, the regional interagency council for which the appointment is to be
made shall submit to the chair of the State Interagency Council for Services
and Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth a list of two (2) names of
transition-age youth who are qualified for appointment from which list the
chair of the State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children
and Transition-Age Youth shall make the appointment. Appointees shall serve
a term of two (2) years, and may be reappointed to additional two (2) year
terms. If the youth member or alternate youth member ceases to be a
consumer of system of care services and supports during the term of
appointment, the member shall be eligible to serve out the remainder of the
term of appointment;
(f) Any other local public or private agency that provides services and supports to
children and transition-age youth with behavioral health needs which the
regional interagency council may invite to have a representative become a
permanent or temporary member of the council; and
(g) One (1) representative from each of the Department of Juvenile Justice,
family resource and youth services centers, the Kentucky Office of Vocational
Rehabilitation, the Department for Community Based Services, and local
health departments.
(2) No member of a regional interagency council for the system of care shall be given
compensation in addition to that which they already receive as service providers or
Page 14 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
state employees, except that the parent and youth members and alternate parent and
youth members of regional interagency councils shall be reimbursed by the regional
interagency council's contracted fiscal agent for all expenses incurred through the
performance of their duties as council members if it is outside the scope of their job
duties.
(3) Each regional interagency council for the system of care shall perform the
following functions:
(a) Conduct regional system of care planning and operations;
(b) Coordinate system-level continuous quality improvement;
(c) Identify and develop system of care expansion opportunities;
(d) Promote awareness of the system of care;
(e) Initiate and adopt interagency agreements as necessary for providing services
and supports to children and transition-age youth with or at risk of behavioral
health needs by the agencies represented in the regional council;
(f) Advise the state interagency council regarding the system of care within the
region; [and]
(g) Participate in family accountability, intervention, and response teams
established pursuant to KRS 605.035; and
(h) 1. Coordinate with the Kentucky Positive Youth Development
Commission established in Section 2 of this Act to establish Suicide
Awareness and Reduction Network workgroups whose membership
shall include but not be limited to members representing:
a. Local school districts;
b. Local law enforcement;
c. School resource officers;
d. Mental health professionals;
e. Local health departments;
Page 15 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1116
f. Child development specialists or pediatricians;
g. Regional community mental health centers;
h. Parents of children and transition-age youth; and
i. Transition age-youth.
2. The workgroups shall:
a. Perform community needs assessments;
b. Research opportunities for positive youth development
programming; and
c. Apply for grants to fund and implement positive youth
development programming.
(4) The secretary for health and family services and the designee of the State
Department of Education shall ensure that regional interagency councils for the
system of care are formed.
(5) Local interagency councils for the system of care may be formed at the discretion of
a regional interagency council to advance the functions of the regional interagency
council at the city, county, or other local community level.
Section 7. Members of the commission appointed under subsection (2)(a)8. to
11. of Section 2 of this Act shall serve an initial term of one (1) year and members of the
commission appointed under subsection (2)(a)12. to 15. of Section 2 of this Act shall
serve an initial term of two (2) years.
Page 16 of 16
BR111600.100 - 1116 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed